Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.651

Use of restraints on pregnant youth in custody—Provision of information to staff and pregnant youth in custody.

(1) The director of the juvenile detention facility shall provide an informational packet about the requirements of chapter 181, Laws of 2010 to all medical staff and nonmedical staff who are involved in the transportation of youth who are pregnant, as well as such other staff as appropriate. The informational packet provided to staff under this section shall be developed as provided in RCW 70.48.800.

(2) The director shall cause the requirements of chapter 181, Laws of 2010 to be provided to all youth who are pregnant, at the time the facility assumes custody of the person. In addition, the facility shall cause a notice containing the requirements of chapter 181, Laws of 2010 to be posted in conspicuous locations in the detention facilities, including but not limited to the locations in which medical care is provided within the facilities.

[ 2010 c 181 s 12.]